tests/fixtures/apertium-mini-spa.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzá</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="habl/ar__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ó</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aron</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>generation-only</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="hablar"><i>habl</i><par n="habl/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="multiword"><i>dos<b/>palabras</i><par n="habl/ar__vblex"/></e>
  </section>
  <section id="regexp" type="standard">
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
